Maryland, session 2026, HB1230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
20–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Minority business enterprise” has the meaning stated in § 14–301 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(c) “Office” means the Office [of Supplier Diversity and Inclusion] established
under § 20–203 of this subtitle.
20–203.
(a) There is an Office [of Supplier Diversity and Inclusion in the Commission]
ESTABLISHED WITHIN THE COMMISSION THAT SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(1) ADMINISTERING EACH OF THE BUSINESS PARTICIPATION AND
VENDOR DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS FOR COMMISSION CONTRACTS AND
SUBCONTRACTS; AND
(2) MONITORING COMPLIANCE WITH PARTICIPATION
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE PROGRAMS ESTABLISHED ADMINISTERING PROGRAMS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS TITLE.
(b) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING THE
NAME OF THE OFFICE.

HOUSE BILL 1230 3
(C) The [head of the Office is the] OFFICE SHALL BE HEADED BY A Director [of
Supplier Diversity and Inclusion].
(c) THE COMMISSION MAY PROVIDE A NAME FOR THE OFFICE
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) The Office shall:
(1) administer each Commission program that is created to remedy
discrimination against minority business enterprises and promote the participation of local
OR small business enterprises OR OTHER BUSINESS ENTERPRISES THAT SUPPORT THE
ECONOMIC OUTCOMES OF SMALL BUSINESSES THAT DO BUSINESS WITH THE
COMMISSION, including:
(i) the minority business enterprise utilization program under §
20–204 of this subtitle; and
(ii) the [local small] business enterprise PARTICIPATION program
ESTABLISHED under Subtitle 3 of this title;
(2) promote and coordinate the plans, programs, and operations of the
Commission to remedy discrimination against minority business enterprises and the effects
of discrimination;
(3) promote activities and the use of the resources of the Commission, local
governments, and private entities to remedy discrimination against minority business
enterprises and the effects of discrimination; [and]
(4) ensure compliance with certified minority business enterprise
subcontract participation goals under § 20–206 of this subtitle; AND
(5) PROMOTE, ENCOURAGE, AND SUPPORT INCREASED BUSINESS
PARTICIPATION AND ECONOMIC OUTCOMES IN COMMISSION CONTRACTS AND
SUBCONTRACTS.
20–301.
In this subtitle, “program” means a local, small, OR OTHER business enterprise
program.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1230
(B) “DISABLED VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT IS
AT LEAST 51% OWNED AND CONTROLLED BY ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS CERTIFIED
BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS AS HAVING A
SERVICE–CONNECTED DISABILITY REGARDLESS OF THE DISABILITY RATING.
(C) “LOCAL BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS WITH:
(1) A PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; OR
(2) AT LEAST 25% OF THE EMPLOYEES OF THE BUSINESS DOMICILED
IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(D) “LOCAL SMALL BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT QUALIFIES AS
BOTH:
(1) A LOCAL BUSINESS; AND
(2) A SMALL BUSINESS.
(E) “MARYLAND–BASED BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT HAS ITS
PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS IN THE STATE.
(F) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE BUSINESS PARTICIPATION PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 20–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) “SMALL BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT MEETS CRITERIA
ESTABLISHED BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 14–203 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(H) “VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESS” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT IS AT LEAST
51% OWNED AND CONTROLLED BY ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE VETERANS
AS DEFINED IN 38 U.S.C. § 101.
20–302.
(a) By resolution or adopting regulations, the Commission may establish a local,
small, OR OTHER business enterprise program BUSINESS PARTICIPATION PROGRAM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The Office [of Supplier Diversity and Inclusion,] established under IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 20–203 of this title[,] shall administer the program.
20–303.

HOUSE BILL 1230 5
The purpose of the program is to assist [small] LOCAL businesses in Montgomery
County and Prince George’s County, SMALL BUSINESSES, OR OTHER BUSINESSES THAT
FURTHER THE COMMISSION’S CONTRACTING, SUBCONTRACTING, AND ECONOMIC
OBJECTIVES BUSINESSES ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM, WITH
PREFERENCE BEING GIVEN TO LOCAL SMALL BUSINESSES AND LOCAL BUSINESSES,
by:
(1) establishing a sheltered market or other appropriate preference; or
(2) facilitating the award of Commission construction contracts or
procurement contracts for goods and services to [small]:
(I) LOCAL businesses in Montgomery County and Prince George’s
County;
(II) SMALL BUSINESSES; OR
(III) OTHER BUSINESSES THAT FURTHER THE COMMISSION’S
CONTRACTING, SUBCONTRACTING, AND ECONOMIC OBJECTIVES ELIGIBLE
BUSINESSES.
20–304.
(a) The Commission shall adopt:
(1) [eligibility criteria for businesses to qualify for the program, including:
(i) the criteria for a small business qualifying under the Small
Business Preference Program as established in regulations adopted by the Department of
General Services under § 14–203 of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
(ii) a requirement that:
1. the business’s principal place of business be in
Montgomery County or Prince George’s County; or
2. at least 25% of the total number of employees of the
business be domiciled in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County; and
(iii) any other] eligibility criteria that the Commission determines to
be necessary or appropriate for the promotion of [small] businesses in the Commission’s
service area, SMALL BUSINESSES, OR OTHER BUSINESSES THAT FURTHER THE
COMMISSION’S CONTRACTING, SUBCONTRACTING, AND ECONOMIC OBJECTIVES
THE FOLLOWING BUSINESSES ARE ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM:

HOUSE BILL 1230
(1) A LOCAL BUSINESS;
(2) A SMALL BUSINESS;
(3) A LOCAL SMALL BUSINESS;
(4) A MARYLAND–BASED BUSINESS;
(5) A DISABLED VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESS THAT IS:
(I) A LOCAL BUSINESS;
(II) A SMALL BUSINESS;
(III) A LOCAL SMALL BUSINESS; OR
(IV) A MARYLAND–BASED BUSINESS; AND
(6) A VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESS THAT IS:
(I) A LOCAL BUSINESS;
(II) A SMALL BUSINESS;
(III) A LOCAL SMALL BUSINESS; OR
(IV) A MARYLAND–BASED BUSINESS.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT:
(1) ANY OTHER ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES TO BE NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE FOR THE PROMOTION OF THE
BUSINESSES SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; and
(2) administrative procedures for conducting the program.
(b) (C) A AN ELIGIBLE business may qualify as a local OR small business
enterprise under TO PARTICIPATE IN the program without regard to the race, ethnicity,
or gender of the participants in the business.
(c) (D) The Commission shall establish criteria for graduation from the
program for a AN ELIGIBLE [local small] business that the Commission determines no
longer requires the assistance or benefits offered by the program.

HOUSE BILL 1230 7
(d) (E) The Commission shall review the eligibility criteria and administrative
procedures of the program each year to assess their effectiveness in furthering the purposes
of the program.
(F) THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT AS A REGISTERED VENDOR ELIGIBLE TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM ANY BUSINESS THAT:
(1) IS A REGISTERED VENDOR THROUGH A VENDOR REGISTRATION
PROCESS IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION; OR
(2) SELF–CERTIFIES AS A VENDOR IN ACCORDANCE WITH
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
SOLICITATION ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION TO INCLUDE EVERY CATEGORY OF
ELIGIBLE BUSINESS.
SUBTITLE 4. VENDOR REGISTRATION.
20–401.
(A) THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT AS A REGISTERED VENDOR FOR THE
COMMISSION ANY PERSON THAT:
(1) IS REGISTERED AS A VENDOR THROUGH A VENDOR REGISTRATION
PROCESS IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION; OR
(2) SELF–CERTIFIES AS A VENDOR IN ACCORDANCE WITH
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SUBTITLE 4. WORKFORCE AND LOCAL ECONOMIC BENEFITS.
20–401.
THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO PROMOTE IN THE
COMMISSION’S CONTRACTS WORKFORCE ENGAGEMENT AND LOCAL ECONOMIC
BENEFITS WITHIN THE COMMISSION’S SERVICE DISTRICT, INCLUDING
ESTABLISHING DEFINITIONS AND STANDARDS FOR CONTRACTOR GOOD FAITH
EFFORTS REGARDING:
(1) LOCAL HIRING AND RECRUITMENT;

HOUSE BILL 1230
(2) SKILLS TRAINING, PRE–APPRENTICESHIP, AND APPRENTICESHIP
PARTICIPATION OR SUPPORT; AND
(3) DATA REPORTING ON WORKFORCE RESIDENCY OR LOCAL
ECONOMIC ACTIVITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act may not be
interpreted to amend, expand, limit, or otherwise affect the Minority Business Enterprise
Program of the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.